New Jersey, session 222, A4778.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no state of emergency declaration issued by the Governor pursuant to P.L.1942, c.251 (C.App.A:9-33 et seq.) shall: (1)  infringe on the right to assemble to worship according to a persons faith; (2)  impact the ability to travel to or from a place of worship; or (3)  authorize any adverse action, including civil or criminal penalties or the imposition of an administrative sanction, against a religious institution or members of a religious organization for exercising their religion. b.  Except as provided in subsection a. of this section, this act, P.L.   , c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall not prohibit the Governor from requiring religious organizations to comply with health, safety, or occupancy requirements issued by the State or federal government that are applicable to all organizations and businesses that provide essential services. 2.  a.  Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no public health emergency declaration issued by the Governor pursuant to P.L.2005, c.222 (C.26:13-1 et seq.) shall: (1)  infringe on the right to assemble to worship according to a persons faith; (2)  impact the ability to travel to or from a place of worship; or (3)  authorize any adverse action, including civil or criminal penalties or the imposition of an administrative sanction, against a religious institution or members of a religious organization for exercising their religion. b.  Except as provided in subsection a. of this section, this act, P.L.   , c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall not prohibit the Governor from requiring religious organizations to comply with health, safety, or occupancy requirements issued by the State or federal government that are applicable to all organizations and businesses that provide essential services. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.